Utah statutes.
58-37f-501.   Costs of operating database and recording and submitting data.

(1)  All department and division costs necessary to establish and operate the database shall be funded by appropriations from:

(a)  the Commerce Service Account; and

(b)  the General Fund.

(2)  All costs associated with recording and submitting data as required in this chapter shall be assumed by the submitting pharmacy.



Enacted by Chapter 287, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 287, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

